District of Columbia statutes.
16-1311

Condemnation proceedings by District of Columbia.

When real property in the District of Columbia is needed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia for sites of schoolhouses, fire or police stations, rights-of-way for roads, highways, streets and alleys or parts thereof, rights-of-way for water mains or sewers, or any other authorized municipal use, and that property cannot be acquired by purchase from the owners thereof at a price satisfactory to the officers of the District authorized to negotiate for the property, a complaint may be filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia for the condemnation of the property or rights-of-way and the ascertainment of its value.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(3)
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 501, 30 DCR 148
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 4(g), 35 DCR 147

History

Railroad company, acquisition authority, see § 9-1203.06.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 2-1225.41, § 6-203, § 9-1203.06, § 10-1601.02, and § 42-3171.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 16-1311.
1973 Ed., § 16-1311.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 days) provisions authorizing the Mayor to assemble the W Street Trash Transfer site, Lots 36, 41, and 802 in Square 3942 and Parcels 0143/107 and 0143/110, through the use of eminent domain, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Lots 36, 41, and 802 in Square 3942 and Parcels 0143/107 and 0143/110 Eminent Domain Authorization Temporary Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-258, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2267).
For temporary (225 days) provisions authorizing the Mayor to assemble the W Street Trash Transfer site, Lots 36, 41, and 802 in Square 3942 and Parcels 0143/107 and 0143/110, through the use of eminent domain, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Lots 36, 41, and 802 in Square 3942 and Parcels 0143/107 and 0143/110 Eminent Domain Authorization Temporary Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-90, Mar. 9, 2016, 63 DCR 798).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (90 days) assembling of the W Street Trash Transfer site, see § 2 of the Lots 36, 41, and 802 in Square 3942 and Parcels 0143/107 and 0143/ 110 Eminent Domain Authorization Emergency Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-584, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1285).
For temporary (90 days) assembling of the W Street Trash Transfer site, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Lots 36, 41, and 802 in Square 3942 and Parcels 0143/107 and 0143/110 Eminent Domain Authorization Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-243, Dec. 21, 2015, 63 DCR 17).

Emergency Legislation

Delegation of Authority for Acquisition of Real Property for Baseball Stadium, see Mayor’s Order 2005-130, September 20, 2005 ( 53 DCR 144).
Delegation of Authority to Chief Property Management Officer Pursuant to D.C. Official Code §§ 16-1311 through 16-1321, see Mayor’s Order 2006-124, September 28, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9316).

Delegation of Authority

Mayor's Orders

Condemnation of Real Property for the New Convention Center, see Mayor’s Order 99-114, July 19, 1999 ( 46 DCR 6693).

Condemnation of an Interest in Real Property, see Mayor’s Order 2000-196, December 15, 2000 ( 47 DCR 10234).

Realignment within the Department of Housing and Community Development; Establishment of the Land Disposition and Asset Management Division, see Mayor’s Order 2000-202, December 26, 2000 ( 48 DCR 930).

Section 4(g) of D.C. Law 7-104 purported to substitute “Mayor” for “Commissioner” apparently without regard to the amendment to this section by D.C. Law 4-201.

Editor's Notes